Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2456.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 6 of General Laws entitled "Commercial Law – General Regulatory
Provisions" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 13.4
CONSUMER PROTECTION FROM INDEMNIFIED (LIABILITY-FREE) PRODUCTS ACT
6-13.4-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Consumer Protection from
Indemnified (Liability-Free) Products Act".
6-13.4-2. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, the following terms shall have the following meaning, unless the
context requires otherwise:
(1) "Consumer" means an individual who enters into a transaction primarily for personal,
family, or household purposes.
(2) "Educational institution" means an institution of learning not operated for profit that is
empowered to confer diplomas, educational, literary, or academic degrees; that has a regular
faculty, curriculum, and organized body of pupils or students in attendance throughout the usual
school year; that keeps and furnishes to students and others records required and accepted for
entrance to schools of secondary, collegiate, or graduate rank.
(3) "Employer" means the state and all political subdivisions of the state and any person in

this state employing four (4) or more individuals, and any person acting in the interest of an
employer directly or indirectly.
(4) "Employment" means an individual's entire service, if the service is localized in the
state. Service is deemed to be localized in the state if:
(i) The service is performed entirely within the state; or
(ii) The service is performed both within and without the state; provided, however, the
service performed without the state is incidental to the individual's service within the state;
(iii)(A) Employment shall include an individual's service, performed within and without
the state, if the service is not localized in any state; provided, however, some of the service is
performed in the state; and
(B) The individual's base of operation is in the state; or
(I) If there is no base of operations then the place for which the service is directed or
controlled is in the state; or
(II) The individual's base of operation or place from which the service is directed or
controlled is not in any state in which some part of the service is performed; provided, however,
the individual's residence is in the state.
(iv) In the event that any employee is denied or fails to receive wage, benefits, or wage
supplements as a result of a violation of this chapter, the employee shall have available civil and
other remedies available at law or equity. The department of labor and training may take any and
all appropriate actions to enforce the provisions of this chapter, including, but not limited to,
injunctions, cease and desist orders, and other penalties provided by law.
(v) Recovery pursuant to a violation of this chapter shall be applicable to secure recovery
against the merged, consolidated, or resulting corporation or other successor employer,
notwithstanding anything contained in this chapter or any law to the contrary.
(vi) This subsection is enacted in order to protect the employment interests of all persons
engaged in employment in the state under existing labor contracts and shall be liberally construed
in every case in order to achieve that purpose.
(5) "Employment opportunity" means an opportunity to be employed.
(6) "Government agencies" means any department, division, office, bureau, board,
commission, authority, nonprofit community organization, or any other agency or instrumentality
created by any municipality or by the state, or to which the state is a party, which is responsible for
the regulation, inspection, visitation, or supervision of facilities or which provides services to
residents of facilities.
(7) "Guardian" means a person appointed or qualified by a court as a guardian of an
LC003332 - Page 2 of 5

individual, including a limited guardian, excluding a person who is only a guardian ad litem.
(8) "Harassment" or "harassing" means following a knowing and willful course of conduct
directed at a specific person with the intent to seriously alarm, annoy, or bother the person, and
which serves no legitimate purpose. The course of conduct shall be such as would cause a
reasonable person to suffer substantial emotional distress, or be in fear of bodily injury.
(9) "Loss of employment" means a person who is no longer employed.
(10) "Mandate" means to officially require something or to direct or require something.
(11) "Opt out" means to decline or defer.
(12) "Private or public education" means the academic program pursued by the person in
obtaining the bachelor's, master's, or doctorate degree, and that the programs include formal course
work, seminars, and practice.
(13) "Promotion" means employees who have been found qualified through suitable tests
for promotion to positions in other classes under the provisions of chapter 4 of title 36 and the rules
pertaining thereto.
(14) "Recommendation" means a representation in favor of a person or thing.
(15) "Requirement" means something that is needed or wanted, compulsory or a necessary
condition.
6-13.4-3. Prohibition of government agencies, employers and educational institutions
making recommendations to consumers to accept indemnified products.
(a) Government agencies, employers, private businesses or educational institutions are
prohibited from mandating liability-free products which would result in a consumer's:
(1) Loss of employment, employment opportunity, or promotion; or
(2) Losing the ability to receive a public or private education.
(b) A consumer or guardian of a consumer shall have the right to decline an indemnified
product which an employer, government agency, private business, or educational institution is
recommending to the consumer without incurring harassment, loss of employment, loss of an
employment opportunity, promotion, or the ability to receive a private or public education.
6-13.4-4. Enforcement and employee civil remedies.
(a) The Rhode Island consumer protection unit within the department of the attorney
general shall pursue a case of this nature if loss of or a threat of loss of employment, promotion,
employment opportunity, or the loss of the ability to receive a public or private education or
harassment occurs due to a consumer or guardian of a consumer declining an indemnified product
which an employer or government agency has recommended.
(b) As a result of any violation of this chapter, employees may pursue civil and other
LC003332 - Page 3 of 5

remedies at law or equity as set forth in §§ 6-13.4-2(4)(iv) through (vi).
6-13.4-5. Public policy.
Any provision of a contract or agreement of any kind that purports to waive or limit in any
way a consumer's rights under this chapter, including, but not limited to, any right to a remedy or
means of enforcement, shall be deemed contrary to public policy and shall be voided and
unenforceable. This section shall not prevent a consumer or the guardian of a consumer to decline
an indemnified product that is recommended by an employer, government agency or educational
institution.
6-13.4-6. Consumer opt out of indemnified products.
A consumer or guardian of a consumer shall be able to opt out from recommended
indemnified products by submitting in writing that they are opting out and shall not be required to
provide specific reasoning for opting out.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003332
========
LC003332 - Page 4 of 5